Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1475
Contribution; intermediary or agent of contributor; disclosure; violation; penalty.

Any person who accepts a contribution, other than by written instrument, on behalf of another and acts as the intermediary or agent of the person from whom the contribution was accepted shall disclose to the recipient of the contribution the intermediary's own name and address and the name and address of the actual source of the contribution. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 75;

Laws 1977, LB 41, § 48.